Maryland, session 2025, HB1064.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
20–202.
(e) (1) This subsection applies only to the Montgomery County Planning
Board.
(2) The Board shall:
(i) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, stream live video or live teleconference audio or other audio of the open
meetings of the Board ONLY IF THE MEETING IS HELD AT:
– 1 –

Ch. 591 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. THE HEADQUARTERS OF THE BOARD; OR
2. A LOCATION WHERE THE BOARD HELD AT LEAST 10
MEETINGS DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR;
(ii) maintain on its website a complete and unedited archived
recording of each open meeting that is livestreamed in accordance with this subsection; and
(iii) notwithstanding § 3–306(b)(2)(i) of the General Provisions
Article:
1. prepare minutes of each meeting as soon as practicable
after the meeting; and
2. publish and maintain on its website the minutes of each
open meeting prepared in accordance with this subsection.
(3) The inability of the Board to comply with paragraph (2)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection due to technical failure that entirely prevents or otherwise affects the quality of
the live video or audio streaming of a meeting of the Board does not affect the validity of
any action taken by the Board during the meeting if:
(i) the Board otherwise complies with this subsection and the Open
Meetings Act; and
(ii) the inability to comply is not due to willful action by the Board.
(4) In addition to complying with the minutes requirements of the Open
Meetings Act under § 3–306 of the General Provisions Article, if the Board is unable to
comply with paragraph (2)(i) of this subsection, the Board shall make good–faith efforts to
record an open meeting by video or audio and maintain on its website a complete and
unedited archived recording of the meeting.
(5) A PROJECT SITE VISIT OR AN EDUCATIONAL FIELD TOUR DOES
NOT CONSTITUTE AN OPEN MEETING UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(I) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IF NO ORGANIZATIONAL BUSINESS IS CONDUCTED.
Article – Public Utilities
17–106.
(e) (1) The Commission shall:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 591
(i) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, stream live video or live teleconference audio or other audio of the open
meetings of the Commission ONLY IF THE MEETING IS HELD AT:
1. THE HEADQUARTERS OF THE COMMISSION; OR
2. A LOCATION WHERE THE COMMISSION HELD AT
LEAST 10 MEETINGS DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR; and
(ii) maintain on its website a complete and unedited archived
recording of each open meeting that is livestreamed in accordance with this subsection.
(2) The inability of the Commission to comply with paragraph (1) of this
subsection due to technical failure that entirely prevents or otherwise affects the quality of
the live video or audio streaming of a meeting of the Commission does not affect the validity
of any action taken by the Commission during the meeting if:
(i) the Commission otherwise complies with this section and the
Open Meetings Act; and
(ii) the inability to comply is not due to willful action by the
Commission.
(3) In addition to complying with the minutes requirements of the Open
Meetings Act under § 3–306 of the General Provisions Article, if the Commission is unable
to comply with the requirements of paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection, the Commission
shall make good faith efforts to record an open session by video or audio and maintain on
its website a complete and unedited archived recording of the meeting.
(4) A PROJECT SITE VISIT OR AN EDUCATIONAL FIELD TOUR DOES
NOT CONSTITUTE AN OPEN MEETING UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IF NO ORGANIZATIONAL BUSINESS IS CONDUCTED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 3 –